Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2836.01
Practice agreement, defined.

Practice agreement means a document signed by a pharmacist and a practitioner with independent prescribing authority, in which the pharmacist agrees to design, implement, and monitor a therapeutic plan based on a written protocol.

Laws 2017, LB166, § 11.